Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2607.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 41, chapter 37, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-3958, to read: START_STATUTE41-3958. Arizona veteran housing and reintegration grant program; fund; administration A. The Arizona veteran housing and reintegration grant program is established to provide grants to counties and tribal governments in this state to do any of the following: 1. fast-track zoning approvals. 2. manage land or sites related to HOUSING for veterans. 3. support philanthropic or nonprofit efforts. 4. aid in building housing for veterans. 5. Reduce jail, crisis response and emergency serviceS costs. 6. Increase access to federal housing monies. 7. expAND Local economic development and THE LOCAL tax base. 8. PRODUCE Long-term savings in behavioral health services and public safety. B. The department shall administer the grant program and may adopt rules, policies and procedures to carry out the purposes of this section. An applicant shall submit an application for a grant on a form PRESCRIBED by the DEPARTMENT. C. COUNTIES AND TRIBAL GOVERNMENTS that RECEIVE monies pursuant to this section shall provide a local match of at least twenty-five percent for rural counties and tribal GOVERNMENTS and fifty percent for urban or suburban counties. d. The Arizona veteran housing and reintegration fund is established consisting of legislative appropriations, federal grants and private donations. The department shall ADMINISTER the fund. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated and may be used to pay the administrative costs of implementing this section and to establish the Arizona VETERAN housing and reintegration grant program PURSUANT to this section. e. The department shall actively pursue and apply for any federal monies for the arizona veteran housing and reintegration fund from all of the following sources: 1. the United STATES department of housing and urban development veterans affairs supportive housing program. 2. the Tribal housing and urban development-veterans affairs supportive housing program. 3. the UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT of Veterans affairs grant and per diem program. 4. the UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS home loan program. 5. the UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND URBAN DEVELOPMENT Community development block grant program. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Appropriation; Arizona veteran housing and reintegration fund; exemption A. The sum of $10,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the Arizona veteran housing and reintegration fund established by section 41-3958, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act. B. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.